Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-916
Retirement system; membership; member of any other system; contribution or transfer of funds; when; Service Annuity Fund; created; use; investment.

(1)(a) On July 1, 2004, the board shall transfer from the School Retirement Fund to the Service Annuity Fund an amount equal to the funded ratio of the retirement system which is equal to the market value of the retirement system assets divided by the actuarial accrued liability of the retirement system, times the actuarial accrued liability of the service annuity, as determined pursuant to section 79-966.01, of the employees who are members of the retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act. Beginning July 1, 2013, such actuarial accrued liability shall be determined for each employee on a level percentage of salary basis. On or before July 1 of each fiscal year, the state shall contribute to the Service Annuity Fund such amounts as may be necessary to pay the normal cost and amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the service annuity, as determined pursuant to section 79-966.01, as of the end of the previous fiscal year of the employees who are members of the retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act. Based on the fiscal year of the retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, the administrator of such system shall provide all membership information needed for the actuary engaged by the retirement board to determine the normal cost and the amortization payment of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability, as determined pursuant to section 79-966.01, to be paid by the state to the Service Annuity Fund each fiscal year as required by this subdivision.

(b) At the time of retirement of any employee who is a member of the retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act and who was hired prior to July 1, 2016, the retirement board shall, upon receipt of a certification of the administrator of such retirement system of the name, identification number, date of birth, retirement date, last date of employment, type of retirement, and number of years of service credited to such eligible employee at the date of retirement, transfer from the Service Annuity Fund to the Class V school district for transfer to the retirement system the actuarial accrued liability of the service annuity to be paid to the Class V school district by the state for transfer to the eligible employee for the years of service thus certified as provided for members of the School Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska under sections 79-933 and 79-952. Such transfer of the actuarial accrued liability to the Class V school district for transfer to the retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act shall be in lieu of the payment of the service annuity to which the employee would be entitled.

(c) The Service Annuity Fund is created. The fund shall consist of the amounts paid by the state and transferred from the School Retirement Fund to the Class V school district for transfer to the retirement system pursuant to this section to pay the service annuity to the Class V school district for transfer to employees who are members of the retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act. Any money in the Service Annuity Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2)(a) For each fiscal year prior to July 1, 2025, in addition to the contribution of the actuarial accrued liability of the service annuity pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the state shall also contribute to the funds of the Class V school district for transfer to the district's retirement system an amount determined by multiplying the compensation of all members of such retirement system by the percent specified in subsection (2) of section 79-966 for determining the amount of the state's payment to the School Retirement Fund plus the amount determined under subdivision (1)(b) of section 79-966. The transfer shall be made annually on or before July 1 of each fiscal year.

(b) For each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in addition to the contribution pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the state shall also contribute to the funds of the Class V school district for transfer to the district's retirement system an amount equal to two percent of the compensation of all members of such retirement system plus the amount determined under subdivision (1)(b) of section 79-966. The contribution shall be made annually on or before July 1 of each fiscal year.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the state contribution of two percent of the compensation of all members of the district's retirement system does not mean that the state assumes any additional financial responsibility or liability for funding obligations of the retirement system that remain the responsibility of the district as described in the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 12, p. 642;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2912;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 446, p. 845;

Laws 1951, c. 292, § 1, p. 970;

Laws 1965, c. 530, § 2, p. 1667;

Laws 1967, c. 547, § 2, p. 1810;

Laws 1967, c. 546, § 5, p. 1802;

Laws 1969, c. 735, § 3, p. 2777;

Laws 1971, LB 987, § 21;

Laws 1984, LB 457, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 549, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 1170, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1512;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 551;

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 14;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 48;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 24;

Laws 2004, LB 1097, § 23;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 21;

Laws 2013, LB553, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB447, § 8;

Laws 2021, LB147, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB645, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 20.
July 18, 2026
Class V School Employees Retirement Act, see section 79-978.01.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.